Hawaii statutes.
§352-25 Furlough, parole, discharge. (a)
The director, for good reasons shown to the director's satisfaction, may
furlough or parole any person committed to the director's custody. The
director shall give the court and the prosecutor's office of the appropriate
county a thirty-day notice prior to discharging a committed person. Prior
court approval shall be obtained when such is specifically required in the
commitment order.

No furlough, parole, or discharge shall be
granted unless it appears to the director that there is a reasonable
probability that the person will not violate the law and that the person's
release is not incompatible with the welfare and safety of society.

(b) When granting parole, the director shall
consider whether:

(1) The results of a risk and needs assessment
indicate the person is at a lower risk to reoffend;

(2) The person has substantially complied with the
facility rules and has had no significant misconduct in the prior two months;

(3) The person has demonstrated efforts toward
rehabilitation;

(4) The person is likely to follow the reentry plan
established pursuant to section 352-8.5; and

(5) A home visit has been completed and the living
situation upon parole is determined to be safe and conducive to rehabilitation.

The form of furlough or parole may include
return to the person's own home, transfer to another youth correctional
facility, a group home or foster home placement, or other appropriate
alternative. Nonresidential programs may be made available to selected persons
on furlough such that they return to the facility during nontreatment hours.

(c) The director shall submit an annual report
to the board of family court judges and the Hawaii juvenile justice state
advisory council. The report shall include the number of persons committed to
the director's custody who are not serving a concurrent term of probation, the
number of those persons who were granted parole in the previous year, the
length of the parole term for each paroled person, and the number of persons on
parole who return to the Hawaii youth correctional facilities for any reason. [L
1980, c 303, pt of §8(1); am L 1990, c 92, §2; am L 1997, c 325, §2; am L 2014,
c 201, §4]

Note

The 2014 amendment applies to delinquent behavior committed
on or after July 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next